North Carolina statutes. Chapter 119. Gasoline and Oil Inspection and Regulation.
Article 2. Liquid Fuels, Lubricating Oils, Greases, etc.

§ 119-7.
Sale of automobile fuels and lubricants by deception as to quality, etc., prohibited.

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, copartnership, partnership or corporation to store, sell, offer or expose for sale any liquid fuels, lubricating oils, greases or other similar products in any manner whatsoever which may deceive, tend to deceive or have the effect of deceiving the purchaser of said products, as to the nature, quality or quantity of the products so sold, exposed or offered for sale.

History.

1933, c. 108, s. 1.

Cross References.

As to prohibition against sale of antifreeze made from certain compounds, see

G.S. 66-66

.

§ 119-8.
Sale of fuels, etc., different from advertised name prohibited.

No person, firm, partnership, copartnership, or corporation shall keep, expose or offer for sale, or sell any liquid fuels, lubricating oils, greases or other similar products from any container, tank, pump or other distributing device other than those manufactured or distributed by the manufacturer or distributor indicated by the name, trademark, symbol, sign or other distinguishing mark or device appearing upon said tank, container, pump or other distributing device in which said products were sold, offered for sale or distributed.

History.

1933, c. 108, s. 2.

Cross References.

As to requirement that brand name be displayed, see

G.S. 119-2

.

§ 119-9.
Imitation of standard equipment prohibited.

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm or corporation to disguise or camouflage his or their own equipment, by imitating the design, symbol, or trade name of the equipment under which recognized brands of liquid fuels, lubricating oils and similar products are generally marketed.

History.

1933, c. 108, s. 3.

§ 119-10.
Juggling trade names, etc., prohibited.

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm or corporation to expose or offer for sale or sell under any trademark, trade name or name or other distinguishing mark any liquid fuels, lubricating oils, greases or other similar products other than those manufactured or distributed by the manufacturer or distributor marketing such products under such trade name, trademark or name or other distinguishing mark.

History.

1933, c. 108, s. 4.

§ 119-11.
Mixing different brands for sale under standard trade name prohibited.

It shall be unlawful for any person or persons, firm or firms, corporation or corporations or any of their servants, agents or employees, to mix, blend or compound the liquid fuels, lubricating oils, greases or similar products of the manufacturer or distributor with the products of any other manufacturer or distributor, or adulterate the same, and expose or offer for sale or sell such mixed, blended or compounded products under the trade name, trademark or name or other distinguishing mark of either of said manufacturers or distributors, or as the adulterated products of such manufacturer or distributor: Provided, however, that nothing herein shall prevent the lawful owner thereof from applying its own trademark, trade name or symbol to any product or material.

History.

1933, c. 108, s. 5.

§ 119-12.
Aiding and assisting in violation of Article prohibited.

It shall be unlawful, and upon conviction punishable as will hereinafter be stated, for any person or persons, firm or firms, partnership or copartnership, corporation or corporations or any of their agents or employees, to aid or assist any other person in violating any of the provisions of this Article by depositing or delivering into any tank, pump, receptacle or other container any liquid fuels, lubricating oils, greases or other like products other than those intended to be stored, therein, as indicated by the name of the manufacturer or distributor, or the trademark, the trade name, name or other distinguishing mark of the product displayed in the container itself, or on the pump or other distributing device used in connection therewith, or shall by any other means aid or assist another in the violation of any of the provisions of this Article.

History.

1933, c. 108, s. 6.

§ 119-13.
Violation made misdemeanor.

Every person, firm or firms, partnership or copartnership, corporation or corporations, or any of their agents, servants or employees, violating any of the provisions of this Article shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

1933, c. 108, s. 7; 1993, c. 539, s. 900; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).